District of Columbia statutes.
6-402

Condemnation proceedings — Filing of plats and petition.

Upon the filing of such plat and petition in the Office of the Mayor of the District of Columbia or when the Mayor shall deem that the public interests require it, the said Mayor shall institute condemnation proceedings in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, by a petition in rem, particularly describing the land to be taken, which petition shall be accompanied by duplicate plats, to be prepared by the Surveyor of said District, showing the location of said proposed building lines, the number of square feet to be taken from each lot or part of lot and the boundaries thereof in each square or block, and such other information as may be necessary for the purposes of such condemnation. Upon the filing of such petition, 1 copy of the plat, indorsed with the docket number of the case, shall be returned by the Clerk of said Court to the said Surveyor for record in his office.

June 21, 1906, 34 Stat. 384, ch. 3505, § 2
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I,§ 155(c)(15)
1981 Ed., § 5-202.
1973 Ed., § 5-202.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.